New Jersey, session 222, A4605.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Department of Environmental Protection, in conjunction with the Fish and Game Council, shall conduct a public awareness campaign concerning hunting in the State.  The purpose of the public awareness campaign shall be to educate residents of the State, and in particular residents living in areas in close proximity to areas where hunting is allowed, concerning hunting seasons, and the rules therefor, and to inform the public about hunting on State-owned land.  The program shall include, but need not be limited to, educational programs and public service announcements.  In developing the public awareness campaign, the department and council shall review methods used by other states to inform residents about hunting activities. 2.  The Director of the Division of Parks and Forestry in the Department of Environmental Protection shall provide for the display, at each State park and forest in which hunting is allowed, of an orange flag at every entrance on any day that hunting is permitted in the State park or forest. 3.  The Commissioner of Environmental Protection shall include with the annual budget request for the Department of Environmental Protection a request for funds sufficient to implement the provisions of this act. 4.  This act shall take effect immediately.